src/morphology/compounding.lexc
!LEXICON R
!+Cmp#:# # ; ! For turning off compounding during testing
! +Cmp#:# NounRoot ;


!LEXICON NounEnd_K
! K ;
! NounEnd ;

LEXICON NounEnd_K-lak
 K-lak ;
 NounEnd ;

LEXICON NounEnd
+CollN+Use/Circ+Cmp/Hyph#@R.DECL-NX.PL@@D.HYPH-COMBO.ACRO@:000%-@R.DECL-NX.PL@@D.HYPH-COMBO.ACRO@ N_myv2x ;
+CollN+Use/Circ+Cmp/Hyph#@R.DECL-NX.SP@@D.HYPH-COMBO.ACRO@:000%-@R.DECL-NX.SP@@D.HYPH-COMBO.ACRO@ N_myv2x ;
!+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#@D.HYPH-COMBO.ACRO@:%-#@D.HYPH-COMBO.ACRO@ N_myv2x ;

!!
LEXICON VerbEnd_deraj
+Clt/Cond:%>деряй K ; !CHECKME 2017-12-13 а лисятдеряй
VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON VerbEnd_K
 K ;
 VerbEnd ;

LEXICON VerbEnd_deraj-lak
+Clt/Cond:%>деряй K	; !CHECKME 2017-12-13 а лисятдеряй
VerbEnd_K-lak ;
LEXICON VerbEnd_K-lak
 K-lak ;
 VerbEnd ;

LEXICON VerbEnd
 WORD-END ;
!+SerialVerb+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# verbs ;
+SerialVerb+Use/Circ+Cmp/Hyph#@D.HYPH-COMBO.ACRO@:000%-@D.HYPH-COMBO.ACRO@ verbs ;
